Utah statutes.
19-7-107.   Privileged communications.

(1)  A person or an officer or employee of that person who performs an environmental self-evaluation, as defined by Section 19-7-103, or assists in the preparation of an environmental audit report, as defined by Section 19-7-103, or a consultant hired for the purpose of performing an environmental self-evaluation or audit report cannot be examined without the consent of the person for which the environmental self-evaluation is conducted unless ordered to testify by a court.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply if the environmental self-evaluation or audit report is subject to discovery or is admissible under Utah Rules of Evidence, Rule 508.



Enacted by Chapter 304, 1995 General Session

